Arkansas, session 2025, SB471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-10-103(f)(B)(ii), concerning filing as a
candidate for nonpartisan elections, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) A candidate may use as the prefix the title of
a nonpartisan judicial office in an election for a nonpartisan judicial
office only if:
(a) The candidate is currently serving in a
judicial position to which the candidate has been elected in the last
election for the office; or
(b) The candidate:
(1) Is a candidate for the office of
circuit judge or district judge a nonpartisan judicial office;
*SSS068*
03/17/2025 8:32:40 AM SSS068

SB471
(2) Is currently serving in the position
of circuit judge or district judge a nonpartisan judicial office as an
appointee; and
(3) Has been serving in that position
for at least twelve (12) months; or
(c) The candidate has previously served in a
nonpartisan judicial office.





























03/17/2025 8:32:40 AM SSS068